Maine, session 132, LD1255.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §10018 is enacted to read:
§10018. In-state tuition for registered voters
A student who is registered to vote in this State is considered to be a resident of this
State and is eligible for in-state tuition rates at any postsecondary educational institution in
this State that offers an in-state tuition rate.
1. Voting residency qualifications. A student who is eligible for in-state tuition rates
under this section must meet the residency qualifications in Title 21-A, sections 111 and
112.
2. Residency. A student who is eligible for in-state tuition rates under this section
may be:
A. Considered a permanent resident, as defined in Title 36, section 681, subsection 4,
for homestead property tax exemption purposes;
B. Considered a resident, as defined in Title 36, section 4062, subsection 6, for estate
tax purposes;
C. Subject to resident income taxes pursuant to Title 36, chapter 823;
D. Considered to be domiciled in the State for probate purposes pursuant to Title 18-C,
section 1-301; and
E. Eligible to run for state office pursuant to the Constitution of Maine, Article IV,
Part First, Section 4; Article IV, Part Second, Section 6; and Article V, Part First,
Section 4.
Additionally, a family member of a student who is eligible for in-state tuition rates under
this section may be eligible for in-state tuition rates at a postsecondary educational
institution in this State.
Sec. 2. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. QQQ, §3 is amended to read:
Sec. QQQ-3. Eligibility and conditions for 2-year free community college
tuition program.
1. Eligibility. For purposes of this Part, an eligible student is:
A. A high school graduate in the class of 2020 or 2021 or a person who obtains the
equivalent of a high school diploma in 2020 or 2021, who enrolls in a Maine
community college no later than during the 2023-2024 academic year;
B. A high school graduate in the class of 2022 or a person who obtains the equivalent
of a high school diploma in 2022, who enrolls in a Maine community college no later
than the 2024-2025 academic year;
C. A high school graduate in the class of 2023 or a person who obtains the equivalent
of a high school diploma in 2023, who enrolls in a Maine community college no later
than the 2025-2026 academic year;
D. A high school graduate in the class of 2024 or a person who obtains the equivalent
of a high school diploma in 2024, who enrolls in a Maine community college no later
than the 2026-2027 academic year; or
Page 1 - 132LR1431(01)

E. A high school graduate in the class of 2025 or a person who obtains the equivalent
of a high school diploma in 2025, who enrolls in a Maine community college no later
than the 2027-2028 academic year.
2. Conditions. In order to receive 2 years of free community college, an eligible
student must:
A. Pursue an associate degree or academic credential;
B. Reside in the State at the time of enrollment in a Maine community college and for
the duration of that enrollment;
B-1. Reside in the State for at least 2 years prior to enrollment in a Maine community
college or be a graduate of a high school in the State;
C. Accept all federal and state grants, scholarships and other sources of funding that
are available and for which the student has applied and qualified; and
D. Complete the program of study within 200% of the stated completion time.